Oklahoma, session 2026, SB462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 34-109 of Title 11, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A municipal police officer who retires under the Oklahoma
Police Pension and Retirement System pursuant to Sections 50-101
through 50-136.8 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes may request to
retain custody and possession of his or her municipal-issued firearm
and badge. The retiring officer shall request in writing to the
head of the municipal law enforcement agency of the municipality in
which the officer is retiring for permission to retain custody and
possession of his or her municipal-issued firearm and badge. The
agency head may grant the request except in the following cases:
1. The officer is not in good standing with the municipal law
enforcement agency from which he or she is retiring;
2. The officer has been convicted of a felony;

3. The officer is mentally incapacitated and could not perform
duties if recalled; or
4. When good cause is shown that granting approval of the
request would be detrimental to public health, safety, and welfare.
B. Upon the death of a municipal police officer prior to
retirement, custody and possession of the firearm and badge may be
awarded by the head of the municipal law enforcement agency to a
spouse or next of kin of the deceased officer in accordance with the
agency’s policy.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 462 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 15th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 462 Page 3